Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 3
NATIONAL GUARD

Section

PART 1 GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE

PART 2 ORGANIZATION

PART 3 OFFICERS

PART 4 ENLISTED PERSONS

PART 5 RIGHTS - EXEMPTIONS - DUTIES

PART 6 PUBLIC AND PRIVATE EMPLOYEES - DUTIES

PART 7 PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT

PART 8 SERVICE BENEFITS

PART 9 ORGANIZATION - ALLOWANCES - DRILLS

PART 10 COURTS-MARTIAL

PART 11 OFFENSES

PART 12 MEDALS - DECORATIONS

PART 13 ENHANCED DRUG INTERDICTION
AND ENFORCEMENT ROLE
FOR THE NATIONAL GUARD

PART 14 COLORADO STATE MILITARY
SERVICE CIVIL RELIEF ACT

PART 15 MILITARY FAMILY RELIEF FUND

PART 16 REAL PROPERTY

PART 17 YOUTH CHALLENGE CORPS PROGRAM